California, session 20252026, AB1390.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1090 of the Education Code is amended to read:1090. (a) The board of supervisors may allow, as compensation, to each regular member of the county board of education a sum not to exceed the following amounts:(1) In any class one county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) per month.(2) In any class two county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) per month.(3) In any class three county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per month.(4) In any class four county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per month.(5) In any class five, class six, class seven, or class eight county, each regular member of the county board of education who actually attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed eight hundred dollars ($800) per month.(b) Any regular member or pupil member who does not attend all meetings held in any month may receive as compensation for the regular member’s or pupil member’s services, an amount not greater than the maximum amount allowed by subdivision (a) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (h), as applicable, divided by the number of meetings held, and multiplied by the number of meetings actually attended.(c) The amount of compensation shall be determined by the county board of supervisors, or, in a county having a fiscally independent county board of education, by the county board of education.(d) A pupil member or regular member of a county board of education may be paid for any meeting for which the member is absent if the board by resolution duly adopted and included within its minutes finds that at the time of the meeting the member was performing services outside the meeting on behalf of the board, the member was ill or on jury duty, or the absence was due to a hardship deemed acceptable by the board.(e) There may also be allowed to each regular member who uses a privately owned automobile in the discharge of necessary official duties as a member of the county board of education, the same amount as allowed by any county official in the performance of the county official’s duties. The mileage rate allowed in this section shall be based on the total mileage claimed in a calendar month.(f) For purposes of this section, the classification of counties shall be determined pursuant to Section 1205.(g) On an annual basis, the county board of education may increase the compensation of individual regular members of the board beyond the limits delineated in this section, in an amount not to exceed 5 percent based on the present monthly rate of compensation. Any increase made pursuant to this section shall be effective upon approval by the county board of education. This action may be rejected by a majority of the voters in that county voting in a referendum established for that purpose, as prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 9100) of Division 9 of the Elections Code.(h) The county board of education may award a pupil member either or both of the following:(1) Elective course credit based on the number of equivalent daily instructional minutes for the pupil member’s services provided.(2) Monthly financial compensation as determined by the county board of education.(i) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Pupil member” means a pupil board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1000.(2) “Regular member” means a board member elected or selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1000.SEC. 2. Section 35120 of the Education Code is amended to read:35120. (a) (1) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year exceeded 250,000, each regular member of the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a salary as set forth by the local city charter law or applicable rules and regulations and as determined by a local compensation review committee.(2) In a school district that is not located in a city and county, and in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year exceeded 60,000, the governing board may prescribe, as compensation for the services of each regular member of the board who attends all meetings held, a sum not to exceed four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500) in any month.(3) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 60,000 or less, but more than 25,000, each regular member of the city board of education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) in any month.(4) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 25,000 or less, but more than 10,000, each regular member of the city board of education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) in any month.(5) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 10,000 or less, but more than 1,000, each regular member of the city board of education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) in any month.(6) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 1,000 or less, each regular member of the city board of education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) in any month.(7) A regular member or pupil member who does not attend all meetings held in any month may receive, as compensation for the regular member’s or pupil member’s services, an amount not greater than the maximum amount allowed by this subdivision or paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), as applicable, divided by the number of meetings held and multiplied by the number of meetings attended.(8) For purposes of providing compensation pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, average daily attendance for the prior school year may be increased by a school district’s percentage of excused absences reported for the 1996–97 fiscal year.(b) The compensation of regular members of the governing board of a school district newly organized or reorganized shall be governed by subdivision (a). For this purpose, the total average daily attendance in all of the schools of the school district in the school year in which the organization or reorganization became effective shall be considered the average daily attendance in the school district for the prior school year.(c) A pupil member or regular member may be paid for any meeting when absent if the board, by resolution duly adopted and included in its minutes, finds that at the time of the meeting the member is performing services outside the meeting for the school district or districts, the member was ill or on jury duty, or the absence was due to a hardship considered acceptable by the board.(d) Compensation provided pursuant to this section shall be a charge against the funds of the school district. If the city board of education or the governing board of the school district is the governing board of more than one school district, the compensation shall be charged against and paid by the respective school districts in the same proportion as the salary of the city superintendent of schools is charged against them. Compensation shall be reduced by an amount equal to any salary or compensation paid to the members of the city board of education from any funds of the city.(e) On an annual basis, the governing board may increase the compensation of regular members beyond the limits delineated in this section, in an amount not to exceed 5 percent based on the present monthly rate of compensation. An increase made pursuant to this subdivision shall be effective upon approval by the governing board.(f) The governing board of a school district may award a pupil member either or both of the following:(1) Elective course credit based on the number of equivalent daily instructional minutes for the pupil member’s services provided.(2) Monthly financial compensation as determined by the governing board.(g) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Pupil member” means a pupil board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 35012.(2) “Regular member” means a board member elected or selected pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 35012.